tests/шӑши.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах шӑши":
    шӑши<n><nom> :  шӑши 
    шӑши<n><gen> :  шӑшин 
    шӑши<n><dat> :  шӑшие 
    шӑши<n><loc> :  шӑшире 
    шӑши<n><abl> :  шӑширен 
    шӑши<n><ins> :  шӑшипе 
    шӑши<n><abe> :  шӑшисӗр 
    шӑши<n><ben> :  шӑшишӗн
    шӑши<n><px1sg><nom> :  шӑшийӗм 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><gen> :  шӑшийӗмӗн 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><dat> :  шӑшийӗме 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><loc> :  шӑшийӗмре 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><abl> :  шӑшийӗмрен 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><ins> :  шӑшийӗмпе 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><abe> :  шӑшийӗмсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><ben> :  шӑшийӗмшӗн
    шӑши<n><px2sg><nom> :  шӑшийӳ 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><gen> :  шӑшийӳн 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><dat> :  шӑшийӳне 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><loc> :  шӑшийӳнте 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><abl> :  шӑшийӳнтен 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><ins> :  шӑшийӳпе 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><abe> :  шӑшийӳсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><ben> :  шӑшийӳшӗн
    шӑши<n><px3sp><nom> :  шӑшийӗ 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><gen> :  шӑшийӗн 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><dat> :  шӑшине 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><loc> :  шӑшийӗнче 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><abl> :  шӑшийӗнчен 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><ins> :  шӑшийӗпе 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><abe> :  шӑшийӗсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><ben> :  шӑшийӗшӗн
    шӑши<n><px1pl><nom> :  шӑшийӗмӗр 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><gen> :  шӑшийӗмӗрӗн 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><dat> :  шӑшийӗмӗре 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><loc> :  шӑшийӗмӗрте 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><abl> :  шӑшийӗмӗртен 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><ins> :  шӑшийӗмӗрпе 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><abe> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><ben> :  шӑшийӗмӗршӗн
    шӑши<n><px2pl><nom> :  шӑшийӗр 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><gen> :  шӑшийӗрӗн 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><dat> :  шӑшийӗре 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><loc> :  шӑшийӗрте 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><abl> :  шӑшийӗртен 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><ins> :  шӑшийӗрпе 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><abe> :  шӑшийӗрсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><ben> :  шӑшийӗршӗн
    шӑши<n><pl><nom> :  шӑшисем 
    шӑши<n><pl><gen> :  шӑшисен 
    шӑши<n><pl><dat> :  шӑшисене 
    шӑши<n><pl><loc> :  шӑшисенче 
    шӑши<n><pl><abl> :  шӑшисенчен 
    шӑши<n><pl><ins> :  шӑшисемпе 
    шӑши<n><pl><abe> :  шӑшисемсӗр 
    шӑши<n><pl><ben> :  шӑшисемшӗн
    шӑши<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  шӑшийӗмсем 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  шӑшийӗмсен 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  шӑшийӗмсене 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  шӑшийӗмсенче 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  шӑшийӗмсенчен 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  шӑшийӗмсемпе 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  шӑшийӗмсемсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  шӑшийӗмсемшӗн
    шӑши<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  шӑшийӳсем 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  шӑшийӳсен 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  шӑшийӳсене 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  шӑшийӳсенче 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  шӑшийӳсенчен 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  шӑшийӳсемпе 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  шӑшийӳсемсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  шӑшийӳсемшӗн
    шӑши<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  шӑшийӗсем 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  шӑшийӗсен 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  шӑшийӗсене 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  шӑшийӗсенче 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  шӑшийӗсенчен 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  шӑшийӗсемпе 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  шӑшийӗсемсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  шӑшийӗсемшӗн
    шӑши<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсем 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсен 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсене 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсенче 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсенчен 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсемпе 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  шӑшийӗмӗрсемшӗн
    шӑши<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  шӑшийӗрсем 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  шӑшийӗрсен 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  шӑшийӗрсене 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  шӑшийӗрсенче 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  шӑшийӗрсенчен 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  шӑшийӗрсемпе 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  шӑшийӗрсемсӗр 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  шӑшийӗрсемшӗн
